Nebraska, session 109, LB801.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB801 LB801
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-6403, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-6403 (1) There is hereby created the state building code. The
Legislature hereby adopts by reference:
(a) The International Building Code (IBC), chapter 13 of the 2024
edition, and all but such chapter of the 2018 edition, except section
101.4.3 and chapter 29, published by the International Code Council,
except that (i) section 305.2.3 applies to a facility having twelve or
fewer children and (ii) section 310.4.1 applies to a care facility for
twelve or fewer persons;
(b) The International Residential Code (IRC), chapter 11 of the 2024
edition, and all but such chapter of the 2018 edition, except section
R313 and chapters 25 through 33, published by the International Code
Council;
(c) The International Existing Building Code, 2018 edition, except
section 809, published by the International Code Council; and
(d) The Uniform Plumbing Code, 2018 edition, designated by the
American National Standards Institute as an American National Standard.
(2) The codes adopted by reference in subsection (1) of this section
and the minimum standards for radon resistant new construction adopted
under section 76-3504 shall constitute the state building code except as
amended pursuant to the Building Construction Act or as otherwise
authorized by state law.
Sec. 2. Section 71-6406, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-6406 (1)(a) Any county, city, or village may enact, administer,
or enforce a local building or construction code if or as long as such
county, city, or village:
(i) Adopts the state building code; or
(ii) Adopts a building or construction code that conforms generally
with the state building code.
-2-

LB801 LB801
2026 2026
(b) If a county, city, or village does not adopt a code as
authorized under subdivision (a) of this subsection within two years
after an update to the state building code, the state building code shall
apply in the county, city, or village, except that such code shall not
apply to construction on a farm or for farm purposes.
(2) A local building or construction code shall be deemed to conform
generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Adopts a special or differing building standard by amending,
modifying, or deleting any portion of the state building code in order to
reduce unnecessary costs of construction, increase safety, durability, or
efficiency, establish best building or construction practices within the
county, city, or village, or address special local conditions within the
county, city, or village;
(b) Adopts any supplement, new edition, appendix, or component or
combination of components of the state building code;
(c) Adopts any of the following:
(i) Chapter 13 of the 2024 edition of the International Building
Code;
(ii) (i) Section 305 or 310 of the 2018 edition of the International
Building Code without the exceptions described in subdivision (1)(a) of
section 71-6403;
(iii) (ii) Section 101.4.3 or any portion of chapter 29 of the 2018
edition of the International Building Code;
(iv) Chapter 11 of the 2024 edition of the International Residential
Code;
(v) (iii) Section R313 or any portion of chapters 25 through 33 of
the 2018 edition of the International Residential Code; or
(vi) (iv) Section 809 of the 2018 edition of the International
Existing Building Code;
(d) Adopts a plumbing code, an electrical code, a fire prevention
code, or any other standard code as authorized under section 14-419,
-3-

LB801 LB801
2026 2026
15-905, 18-132, or 23-172;
(e) Adopts a local energy code as authorized under section 81-1618;
or
(f) Adopts minimum standards for radon resistant new construction
which meet the minimum standards adopted under section 76-3504.
(3) A local building or construction code shall not be deemed to
conform generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Includes a prior edition of any component or combination of
components of the state building code; or
(b) Does not include minimum standards for radon resistant new
construction that meet the minimum standards adopted under section
76-3504.
(4) A county, city, or village shall notify the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment if it amends or modifies its local building or
construction code in such a way as to delete any portion of (a) chapter
13 of the 2024 2018 edition of the International Building Code or (b)
chapter 11 of the 2024 2018 edition of the International Residential
Code. The notification shall be made within thirty days after the
adoption of such amendment or modification.
(5) A county, city, or village shall not adopt or enforce a local
building or construction code other than as provided by this section.
(6) A county, city, or village which adopts or enforces a local
building or construction code under this section shall regularly update
its code. For purposes of this section, a code shall be deemed to be
regularly updated if the most recently enacted state building code or a
code that conforms generally with the state building code is adopted by
the county, city, or village within two years after an update to the
state building code.
(7) A county, city, or village may adopt amendments for the proper
administration and enforcement of its local building or construction code
including organization of enforcement, qualifications of staff members,
-4-

LB801 LB801
2026 2026
examination of plans, inspections, appeals, permits, and fees. Any
amendment adopted pursuant to this section shall be published separately
from the local building or construction code. Any local building or
construction code adopted under subdivision (1)(a) of this section or the
state building code if applicable under subdivision (1)(b) of this
section shall be the legally applicable code regardless of whether the
county, city, or village has provided for the administration or
enforcement of its local building or construction code under this
subsection.
(8) A county, city, or village which adopts one or more standard
codes as part of its local building or construction code under this
section shall keep at least one copy of each adopted code, or portion
thereof, for use and examination by the public in the office of the clerk
of the county, city, or village prior to the adoption of the code and as
long as such code is in effect.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Building Construction Act,
a public building of any political subdivision shall be built in
accordance with the applicable local building or construction code. Fees,
if any, for services which monitor a builder's application of codes shall
be negotiable between the political subdivisions involved, but such fees
shall not exceed the actual expenses incurred by the county, city, or
village doing the monitoring.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-6403, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 71-6406, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-5-